Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3297.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1003 of Title 40, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Department of Labor to be designated the “Oklahoma Wrecker
and Towing Services Revolving Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations. All monies accruing
to the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and shall be
budgeted and expended by the Department of Labor for the purpose of
administering the Oklahoma Wrecker Services Division established
pursuant to Section 2 of this act. Expenditures from the fund shall
be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims
filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of
Management and Enterprise Services for approval and payment.


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 3
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 3-111 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. The Oklahoma Wrecker Services Division is hereby created
within the Department of Labor, which shall consist of such
divisions, sections, committees, offices, and positions established
by the Department of Labor. The Division shall employ a Division
Director and a team of five employees to investigate consumer
complaints related to overcharging for nonconsensual towing,
recovery, storage fees, and violations of the rules promulgated by
the Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services Board, established pursuant
to Section 6 of this act. Division employees may act as analysts,
administrative assistants, administrative technicians, and
investigators.
B. 1. The applicable powers, duties, and responsibilities
exercised by the Transportation Division of the Corporation
Commission relating to wrecker and towing services shall be
transferred to the Department of Labor on April 1, 2027. All
records, property, equipment, assets, monies, financial interests,
liabilities, matters pending, and funds of the Commission related to
wrecker and towing services shall be transferred to the Department
of Labor.
2. With the exception of initial inspections of wrecker and
towing facilities and equipment and rotation log requirements
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 4
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

perf ormed by the Department of Public Safety, the applicable powers,
duties, and responsibilities for regulating the wrecker and towing
industry in this state exercised by the Department of Public Safety
shall be transferred to the Department of Labor on November 1, 2026.
All records, property, equipment, assets, monies, financial
interests, liabilities, matters pending, and funds of the Department
of Public Safety related to wrecker and towing services shall be
transferred to the Department of Labor.
C. The Department of Labor shall succeed to any contractual
rights or responsibilities incurred by the Commission pertaining to
wrecker and towing services.
D. The administrative rules related to wrecker and towing
services previously promulgated by the Commission shall be
transferred to and become a part of the administrative rules of the
Department of Labor upon the effective date of this act. The Office
of Administrative Rules within the Office of the Secretary of State
shall provide adequate notice in “The Oklahoma Register” of the
transferred rules and shall place the transferred rules under the
Oklahoma Administrative Code section of the Department of Labor. On
the effective date of this act, any amendment, repeal, or addition
to the transferred rules shall be under the rulemaking authority of
the Department of Labor.
E. Aside from rules promulgated by the Department of Public
Safety pertaining to rotation logs and initial inspections of
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 5
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

wrec ker and towing facilities and equipment, the administrative
rules previously promulgated by the Department of Public Safety
shall be transferred to and become a part of the administrative
rules of the Department of Labor upon the effective date of this
act. The Office of Administrative Rules within the Office of the
Secretary of State shall provide adequate notice in “The Oklahoma
Register” of the transferred rules and shall place the transferred
rules under the Oklahoma Administrative Code section of the
Department of Labor. On the effective date of this act, any
amendment, repeal, or addition to the transferred rules shall be
under the rulemaking authority of the Department of Labor.
F. The Department of Labor, the Corporation Commission, and the
Department of Public Safety shall enter into an agreement for the
transfer of personnel from the Commission and the Department of
Public Safety to the Department of Labor. However, in no instance
shall more than six employees receive transfers. No employee shall
be transferred to the Department of Labor except upon receipt of
written consent of the employee. No employee who is transferred to
the Department of Labor shall be required to accept a lesser grade
or salary than presently received. All employees shall retain
leave, sick, and annual time earned, and any retirement and
longevity benefits that have accrued during their tenure with the
Corporation Commission or the Department of Public Safety. The

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 6
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

tran sfer of any personnel between the state agencies shall be
coordinated with the Office of Management and Enterprise Services.
G. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall
coordinate the transfer of records, properties, equipment, assets,
funds, allotments, purchase orders, liabilities, outstanding
financial obligations, or encumbrances provided for in this section.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 156.1, as
last amended by Section 55, Chapter 452, O.S.L. 2024 (47 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 156.1), is amended to read as follows:
Section 156.1. A. It shall be unlawful for any state official,
officer or employee, except any essential employees approved by the
Governor and those officers or employees authorized in subsection B
of this section, to ride to or from the place of residence of the
employee in a state-owned or state-leased automobile, truck or
pickup, except in the performance of the official duty of the
employee, or to use or permit the use of any such automobile, truck,
ambulance or pickup for other personal or private purposes. Any
person convicted of violating the provisions of this section shall
be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not
more than One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) or by imprisonment in the
county jail for a period to not exceed thirty (30) days, or by both
said fine and imprisonment, and in addition thereto, shall be
discharged from state employment.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 7
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

B. 1. Any state employee, other than the individuals provided
for in paragraph 2 of this subsection and any employee of the
Department of Public Safety Labor who is a wrecker inspector or
auditor of the Wrecker Services Division as provided for in
paragraph 3 of this subsection, who receives emergency telephone
calls regularly at the residence of the employee when the employee
is not on duty and is regularly called upon to use a vehicle after
normal work hours in response to such emergency calls, may be
permitted to use a vehicle belonging to the state to provide
transportation between the residence of the employee and the
assigned place of employment, provided such distance does not exceed
seventy-five (75) miles in any round trip or is within the county
where the assigned place of employment is located. Provided
further, an employee may be permitted to use a state-owned or state-
leased vehicle to provide temporary transportation between a
specific work location other than the assigned place of employment
and the residence of the employee, if such use shall result in a
monetary saving to the agency, and such authorization shall not be
subject to the distance or area restrictions provided for in this
paragraph. Authorization for temporary use of a state-owned or
state-leased vehicle for a specific project shall be in writing
stating the justification for this use and the saving expected to
result. Such authorization shall be valid for not to exceed sixty
(60) days. Any state entity other than law enforcement that avails
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 8
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

itse lf of this provision shall keep a monthly record of all
participating employees, the number of emergency calls received and
the number of times that a state vehicle was used in the performance
of such emergency calls.
2. Any employee of the Department of Public Safety Labor,
Oklahoma Department of Corrections, Office of the Attorney General,
Oklahoma State Bureau of Narcotics and Dangerous Drugs Control,
Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, Alcoholic Beverage Laws
Enforcement Commission, Oklahoma Horse Racing Commission, Oklahoma
Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry, Office of the
Inspector General within the Department of Human Services or Office
of the State Fire Marshal, who is a law enforcement officer or
criminalist, Public Information officer, Special Investigator or
Assistant Director of the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation,
the Executive Director of CLEET, CLEET-certified Investigator for a
state board or any employee of a district attorney who is a law
enforcement officer, may be permitted to use a state-owned or state-
leased vehicle to provide transportation between the residence of
the employee and the assigned place of employment and between the
residence and any location other than the assigned place of
employment to which the employee travels in the performance of the
official duty of the employee.
3. Any employee of the Department of Public Safety Labor who is
a wrecker inspector or auditor of the Wrecker Services Division, or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 9
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a no ncommissioned pilot may be permitted, as determined by the
Commissioner of Labor, to use a state-owned or state-leased vehicle
to provide transportation between the residence of the employee and
the assigned place of employment and between the residence and any
location other than the assigned place of employment to which the
employee travels in the performance of the official duty of the
employee.
4. The Director, department heads and other essential employees
of the Department of Wildlife Conservation, as authorized by the
Wildlife Conservation Commission, may be permitted to use a state-
owned or state-leased vehicle to provide transportation between the
residence of the employee and the assigned place of employment and
between the residence and any location other than the assigned place
of employment to which the employee travels in the performance of
the official duty of the employee.
5. The Director, department heads, emergency responders and
other essential employees of the Department of Corrections, as
authorized by the Director, may be permitted to use a state-owned or
state-leased vehicle to provide transportation between the residence
of the employee and the assigned place of employment and between the
residence and any location other than the assigned place of
employment to which the employee travels in the performance of the
official duty of the employee.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 10
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. Designated Examiner Auditors, Designated Examiner
Supervisors, Commercial Driver License Examiners, Commercial Driver
License Auditors, Commercial Driver License Supervisors, and Driver
License Supervisors, as an employee of Service Oklahoma may be
permitted, as determined by the Director of Service Oklahoma, to use
a state-owned or state-leased vehicle to provide transportation
between the residence of the employee and the assigned place of
employment and between the residence and any location other than the
assigned place.
7. The Attorney General, division heads, emergency responders,
agents, assistant attorneys general, and other essential employees
of the Office of the Attorney General, as authorized by the Attorney
General, may be permitted to use a state-owned or state-leased
vehicle to provide transportation between the residence of the
employee and the assigned place of employment and between the
residence and any location other than the assigned place of
employment to which the employee travels in the performance of the
official duty of the employee.
C. The principal administrator of the state agency with which
the employee is employed shall so designate the status of the
employee in writing or provide a copy of the temporary authorization
to the Governor, the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and the
Speaker of the House of Representatives. Such employee status
report shall also be provided to the State Fleet Manager of the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 11
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Divi sion of Fleet Management if the motor vehicle for emergency use
is provided by said Division.
SECTION 4. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 904, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 904. The owner of a motor vehicle or lienholder of the
vehicle abandoned in violation of Section 901 et seq. of this title,
or the owner of any vehicle or lienholder of the vehicle or insurer
accepting liability for paying a claim on a vehicle or purchasing
the vehicle as a total loss vehicle from the registered owner which
shall have been lawfully removed from any highway or other public
property may regain possession of the vehicle in accordance with
regulations of the Department of Public Safety Labor upon payment of
the reasonable cost of removal and storage of such vehicle. The
operator is authorized to collect all lawful fees from the owner,
lienholder that seeks possession of a vehicle under a security
interest, agent, or insurer accepting liability for paying the claim
for a vehicle or purchasing the vehicle as a total loss vehicle from
the registered owner of the towed vehicle for the performance of any
and all such services. An operator shall release the vehicle from
storage upon authorization from the owner, agent or lienholder of
the vehicle or in the case of a total loss, the insurer accepting
liability for paying the claim on the vehicle or purchasing the
vehicle where the vehicle is to be moved to an insurance pool yard
for sale. In the case of death or incapacitation of the owner of a
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 12
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

moto r vehicle, the operator may release the vehicle to a legal
representative or an immediate family member who is within the first
or second degree of consanguinity or affinity. The legal
representative or family member shall provide a notarized affidavit
describing his or her relationship to the owner of the motor vehicle
and proof of identity in accordance with the Department’s rules
related to establishing identity.
The cost of removal and storage shall be paid to the wrecker or
towing service.
SECTION 5. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 951, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 951. As used in Sections 951 through 965 968 of this
title and Sections 1 through 3 and 2 of this act:
1. “Wrecker or wrecker vehicle” means any motor vehicle that is
equipped with any device designed to tow another vehicle or
combination of vehicles. The use of the term “wrecker” or “wrecker
vehicle” shall be construed to include a combination wrecker or
combination wrecker vehicle, as defined in paragraph 2 of this
section, unless a specific differentiation is otherwise described;
2. “Combination wrecker” or “combination wrecker vehicle” means
any wrecker vehicle which is designed and equipped with two separate
and distinct devices to tow simultaneously two or more other
vehicles or combinations of vehicles, whether or not both devices
are in use simultaneously. One of the devices shall allow another
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 13
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

vehi cle to be loaded onto and transported upon the wrecker vehicle,
and one of the devices shall allow another vehicle to be attached to
and pulled by the wrecker vehicle;
3. “Tow” or “towing” means the use of a wrecker vehicle to
lift, pull, move, haul or otherwise transport any other vehicle by
means of:
a. attaching the vehicle to and pulling the vehicle with
the wrecker vehicle, or
b. loading the vehicle onto and transporting the vehicle
upon the wrecker vehicle;
4. “Rollback equipment” means a towing device or equipment upon
which the towed vehicle is loaded and transported, removing the
towed vehicle completely from the surface of the roadway. The term
“rollback equipment” shall include car haulers;
5. “Dolly” means a towing device or equipment which lifts and
suspends one axle of the towed vehicle above the surface of the
roadway;
6. “Wrecker or towing service” means engaging in the business
of or performing the act of towing or offering to tow any vehicle,
except:
a. where the operator owns the towed vehicle and displays
on both sides of the wrecker vehicle in plainly
visible letters not less than two (2) inches in height
the words “NOT FOR HIRE”,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 14
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

b. where the service is performed by a transporter as
defined in Section 1-181 of this title,
c. where service is performed in conjunction with the
transportation of household goods and property,
d. where the wrecker vehicle is owned or operated by the
United States government, the State of Oklahoma, or
any department or political subdivision thereof, or
e. where the service is performed by an out-of-state
wrecker service at the request of the vehicle owner or
operator, the vehicle is not involved in a collision,
and is being towed:
(1) in either direction across the border between
Oklahoma and a neighboring state, or
(2) through Oklahoma in transit to another state;
provided, the out-of-state wrecker service shall
comply with all other requirements regarding
interstate commerce as set forth in law;
7. “Commissioner” means the Commissioner of Public Safety
Labor;
8. “Commission” means the Corporation Commission;
9. “Department” means the Department of Public Safety Labor;
10. “Nonconsensual tow” means the transportation of a vehicle
without the consent or knowledge of the vehicle’s owner, possessor,
agent, insurer, lienholder, or any other person in possession of or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 15
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

in c harge of any vehicle and includes the transportation or towing
of the vehicle under lawful circumstances or necessity for the
public interest including removing from the roadway for public
safety or public convenience, or accidents, by any law enforcement
officer or property agent or removal from public or private property
as a result of abandonment or unauthorized parking by the property
owner, agent, possessor, or other legal entity for the property
owner;
11. “Operator” means any person owning or operating a wrecker
vehicle or wrecker or towing service;
12. “Officer” means any duly authorized law enforcement
officer;
13. “Reasonable tow rates” means rates that are directly
related to the actual cost of providing the nonconsensual tow,
include a modest and customary margin, and do not exceed the maximum
rates as approved by the Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services Board
established pursuant to Section 6 of this act;
14. “Roadway” means any public street, road, highway or
turnpike or the median, easement or shoulder of a roadway;
14. 15. “Service call” means the act of responding to a request
for service with a wrecker vehicle in which a service is performed;
and
15. 16. “Vehicle” shall:

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 16
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. have the same meaning as defined in Section 1-186 of
this title, and
b. for the purposes of this chapter when referring to a
vehicle or combination of vehicles being towed or
stored, include a vessel. The term “vessel” shall
have the same meaning as defined in Section 4002 of
Title 63 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
SECTION 6. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 951.1 of Title 47, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. There is hereby created, pursuant to the Oklahoma Sunset
Law, until January 1, 2032, the Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services
Board, which shall be the regulatory authority for the Oklahoma
Wrecker Services Division established pursuant to Section 2 of this
act. The Board shall consist of nine (9) members who shall
initially serve staggered terms of membership on the Board. The
initial staggered terms of membership on the Board shall be as
follows:
1. One member holding a license or who is licensed by the
Department of Labor to engage in nonconsensual towing who operates
in a county with a population of one hundred thousand (100,000) or
more according to the latest Federal Decennial Census, shall be
appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and such
membership shall expire June 30, 2030;
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 17
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. One member holding a license or who is licensed by the
Department of Labor to engage in nonconsensual towing who operates
in a county with a population of less than one hundred thousand
(100,000) according to the latest Federal Decennial Census, shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and such
membership shall expire June 30, 2028;
3. One member from the Oklahoma Trucking Association shall be
appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives and such
membership shall expire June 30, 2029;
4. One member from law enforcement shall be appointed by the
Governor and such membership shall expire June 30, 2030;
5. One member holding a license or who is licensed by the
Department of Labor to engage in nonconsensual towing shall be
appointed by the Governor and such membership shall expire June 30,
2028;
6. One member from the commercial insurance industry shall be
appointed by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and such
membership shall expire June 30, 2029;
7. One member from the Department of Transportation shall be
appointed by the Governor and such membership shall expire June 30,
2030;
8. One member, who is in an industry unrelated to any other
member of the Board, shall be appointed by the Governor from the
state at large and such membership shall expire June 30, 2028; and
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 18
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

9. One member, who is in an industry unrelated to any other
member of the Board, shall be appointed by the Governor from the
state at large and such membership shall expire June 30, 2029.
Thereafter, persons appointed pursuant to paragraphs 1 through 9
of this subsection shall be appointed for terms of three (3) years
beginning July 1. Any vacancy shall be filled by the appointing
authority for the remainder of the unexpired term.
B. Members appointed pursuant to paragraphs 3 through 9 of
subsection A of this section shall remain engaged in the business or
industry described in subsection A of this section. A member so
appointed who no longer satisfies the requirements for his or her
Board position pursuant to subsection A of this section shall
provide notification of his or her change of status to his or her
appointing authority and to the chair of the Board, and shall resign
from the Board within thirty (30) days of the date upon which the
member no longer satisfies the requirements of the appointment.
C. The members shall determine who shall serve as chair by
majority vote of the quorum of the Board. The chair shall be
elected annually, with the right to succeed himself or herself, from
the membership of the Board.
D. The Board shall meet at such times that the chair deems
necessary, but no meeting shall be held outside of this state. All
actions of the Board shall be by a quorum. Five members of the
Board shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of transacting
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 19
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

busi ness. The Department of Labor shall provide administrative
support and a meeting venue for the Board.
E. Nothing in this act shall be construed to authorize the
Board to regulate consensual towing services, voluntary roadside
assistance, or privately negotiated towing contracts. The Board
shall promulgate rules under the authority of the Department of
Labor to carry out its intent and shall regulate the nonconsensual
wrecker and towing industry in this state, including:
1. Establishing maximum tow rates for nonconsensual tows. Such
rates may be adjusted every three (3) years by the Board;
2. Establishing reasonable licensing, insurance, and equipment
requirements for any person engaging in nonconsensual towing and
related services;
3. Establishing reasonable tow truck safety requirements for
any wrecker or wrecker vehicle as defined in Section 951 of Title 47
of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Establishing a procedure to accept and investigate
complaints from a consumer who claims that he or she has been
overcharged for fees related to nonconsensual towing, recovery, or
storage;
5. Determining and sanctioning excessive or unnecessary fees
charged to consumers related to nonconsensual towing, recovery, or
storage;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 20
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

6. Requiring all entities permitted, licensed, or regulated by
the Board to provide all documents in response to information
requests by the Board pursuant to the investigation of consumer
complaints or Board complaints against the permittee or licensee;
7. Requiring all entities permitted, licensed, or regulated by
the Board to provide itemized billing for fees related to
nonconsensual towing, storage, or vehicle immobilization services
that explains how the charges were calculated;
8. Requiring all entities permitted, licensed, or regulated by
the Board to maintain a copy of the current maximum rate schedule or
fee schedule established by the Board posted in a conspicuous place
and readily accessible to the public;
9. Requiring all entities permitted, licensed, or regulated by
the Board to allow the owner or agent of the owner of a motor
vehicle removed pursuant to Section 951 et seq. of Title 47 of the
Oklahoma Statutes to use any other entity permitted, licensed, or
regulated by the Board when reclaiming the motor vehicle from
storage;
10. Requiring all entities permitted, licensed, or regulated by
the Board to post a sign notifying customers of the procedure to
obtain a vehicle from storage and the consumer complaint process
pursuant to Section 953.1 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
Such sign shall be in a conspicuous and central location in the
public area of the business and shall be a minimum of sixteen (16)
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 21
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

inch es by twenty (20) inches in size. The Board may assess a fine
not less than Fifty Dollars ($50.00) and not more than Two Hundred
Fifty Dollars ($250.00) for failure to comply with the provisions of
this paragraph;
11. Utilizing Oklahoma Wrecker Services Division, established
pursuant to Section 2 of this act, investigators to investigate
consumer complaints related to overcharging for nonconsensual
towing, recovery, storage fees, and violations of the rules
promulgated by the Board;
12. Promulgating rules and the authority of the Department of
Labor that shall set standards and procedures for any additional
inspections required by the Board; and
13. Submitting promulgated rules to the Department for
approval.
F. Members of the Board shall serve without compensation, and
shall be reimbursed through the Department for expenses incurred in
the performance of their duties in accordance with the provisions of
the State Travel Reimbursement Act.
G. Each member shall serve at the pleasure of his or her
appointing authority and may be removed or replaced without cause.
H. The Board shall act in accordance with the provisions of the
Oklahoma Open Records Act, the Oklahoma Open Meeting Act, and the
Administrative Procedures Act.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 22
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 7. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 952, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 952. A. Except for the rates established by the
Corporation Commission and other provisions as provided for by law,
inspections conducted for the initial licensure of a wrecker or
towing operator and rotation logs that shall be performed by the
Department of Public Safety, the Department of Labor shall have the
power and authority necessary to license, supervise, govern and
control wrecker vehicles and wrecker or towing services.
B. 1. The Department of Public Safety Labor, through the
Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services Board established pursuant to
Section 6 of this act, shall adopt and prescribe such rules as are
necessary to carry out the intent of Section 951 et seq. of this
title.
2. All rules promulgated by the Department of Public Safety,
not including any rules concerning rotation logs and initial
inspections currently in place, carrying out the provisions of
Section 951 et seq. of this title shall be enforced by the
Department of Labor until such time as the Department of Labor
promulgates new rules.
3. The rules shall state the requirements for facilities, for
storage of vehicles, necessary towing equipment, the records to be
kept by operators, liability insurance and insurance covering the
vehicle and its contents while in storage in such sum and with such
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 23
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

prov isions as the Department Board deems necessary to adequately
protect the interests of the public, and such other matters as the
Department Board may prescribe for the protection of the public.
C. Unless otherwise regulated by the governing body of the
political subdivision, the wrecker vehicle used to perform wrecker
or towing services requested by a political subdivision of this
state for removal of a vehicle from public property for reasons
listed in Section 955 of this title shall be from the licensed
wrecker or towing service whose location is nearest to the vehicle
to be towed. Requests for service may be alternated or rotated
among all such licensed wrecker or towing services which are located
within a reasonable radius of each other. In cities of less than
fifty thousand (50,000) population, all such licensed wrecker or
towing services located near or in the city limits of such cities
shall be considered as being equal distance and shall be called on
an equal basis as nearly as possible. The police chief of any
municipality and the county sheriff of each county shall keep
rotation logs on all requested tows, except where there are
insufficient licensed wrecker or towing services available to rotate
such services or services are contracted after a competitive bid
process. Rotation logs shall be made available for public
inspection upon request. Any calls made from cell phones or two-way
radios by any law enforcement officer or employee of any
municipality or county to any wrecker service shall be listed on the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 24
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

rota tion or call logs and made available for public inspection. A
wrecker service shall not be removed from rotation without
notification to the wrecker operator stating the reason for removal
from the rotation log. All notification for removal from a rotation
log shall be mailed to the wrecker service owner at least ten (10)
days before removal from the rotation log and shall state the
procedure and requirements for reinstatement.
D. 1. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection, the
Department of Public Safety and any municipality, county or other
political subdivision of this state shall not place any wrecker or
towing service upon an official rotation log for the performance of
services carried out pursuant to the request of or at the direction
of any officer of the Department of Public Safety or municipality,
county or political subdivision unless the service meets the
following requirements:
1. Principal
a. principal business facilities are located within
Oklahoma;,
2. Tow
b. tow trucks are registered and licensed in Oklahoma;,
and
3. Owner
c. owner is a resident of the State of Oklahoma this
state or the service is an Oklahoma corporation.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 25
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. In the event a licensed wrecker or towing service is not
located within a county, a wrecker or towing service that is located
outside of the county or this state and does not meet the above
qualifications may be placed on the rotation log for the county or
any municipality or political subdivision located within the county.
3. When performing services at the request of any officer, no
operator or wrecker or towing service upon the rotation logs shall
charge fees in excess of the maximum rates for services performed
within in this state, including incorporated and unincorporated
areas, as established by the Commission Board.
E. The Department of Public Safety shall place a licensed Class
AA wrecker service on the Highway Patrol Rotation Log in a highway
patrol troop district in which the place of business and the primary
storage facility of the wrecker service are located upon written
request filed by the wrecker service with the Department of Public
Safety. Upon further request of the wrecker service, the
Commissioner of Public Safety or the Department of Public Safety
employee with statewide responsibility for administration of wrecker
services may place a wrecker service on the Highway Patrol Rotation
Log in a district adjacent to the district in which the place of
business and the primary storage facility of the wrecker service are
located if the wrecker service is in proximity to and within a
reasonable radius of the boundary of the district. When a wrecker
service is placed on the rotation log in a district, the Department
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 26
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

of P ublic Safety shall notify the wrecker service and the troop
commander of the district.
F. The Commissioner of Public Safety or the Department of
Public Safety employee with statewide responsibility for
administration of wrecker services shall be responsible for
establishing geographical areas of rotation within the troop
districts and for notifying each wrecker service of the geographical
areas of rotation to which the service is assigned.
G. The Department of Public Safety shall make all rotation logs
available for public inspection at the state office and shall make
rotation logs for a highway patrol troop district available for
public inspection at the district office.
H. The Department of Labor, through the Oklahoma Wrecker and
Towing Services Board, shall promulgate rules that classify wrecker
and towing services by the type of services and equipment they are
capable of providing for nonconsensual tows and accident
remediation.
SECTION 8. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 953, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 953. A. No operator shall be permitted nor shall any
employee of any operator be permitted, allowed or caused to solicit
business or make service calls without the operator first having
obtained from the Department of Public Safety Labor a license to
operate a wrecker or towing service. The number of the license
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 27
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

shal l be displayed, in conformance with rules of the Department, on
both sides of every wrecker vehicle operated by the wrecker or
towing service.
B. The license fee required by this section shall be in lieu of
the motor carrier filing fee as required in Section 165 of this
title. No applicant for a wrecker license shall be required to
prove public convenience and necessity, file notices, nor shall a
public hearing be held. The fee for such license shall be Five
Hundred Dollars ($500.00), of which Ninety Dollars ($90.00) Two
Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) shall be deposited in the General
Revenue Fund Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services Revolving Fund
established pursuant to Section 1 of this act and Four Hundred Ten
Dollars ($410.00) Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) shall be
deposited in the Department of Public Safety Restricted Revolving
Fund created pursuant to Section 2-145 of this title for the
administration of the Department’s Wrecker Services Division and
modernization of computer programs. No license fee shall be
refunded in the event the license is suspended or revoked.
C. All licenses shall expire on the last day of the calendar
year and may be renewed annually at a cost of Two Hundred Fifty
Dollars ($250.00) upon application to the Department of Labor as
prescribed by rule. Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) of the The fees
collected in pursuant to the provisions of this subsection shall be
deposited in the Department of Public Safety Restricted Revolving
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 28
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Fund created in Section 2-145 of this title for the modernization of
computer programs and the administration of the Department’s Wrecker
Services Division and Fifty Dollars ($50.00) shall be deposited in
the General Revenue Fund Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services
Revolving Fund established pursuant to Section 1 of this act. No
license fee shall be refunded in the event the license is suspended
or revoked.
D. The Department shall issue a letter of reprimand, cancel,
suspend, revoke, or refuse to issue or renew the license of an
operator when it finds the licensee or applicant has not complied
with or has violated any of the provisions of the Nonconsensual
Towing Act of 2011, or any rules adopted by the Department. A
suspension or revocation shall be for a period of time deemed
appropriate by the Department for the violation. Any canceled,
suspended, or revoked license shall be returned to the Department by
the operator, and the operator shall not be eligible to apply for
another license until the period of suspension or revocation has
elapsed.
E. The provisions of the Administrative Procedures Act are
expressly made applicable to the Nonconsensual Towing Act of 2011.
F. In any civil action to enforce the equal application of the
alternation or rotation of wrecker or towing services regulated by a
political subdivision of the state, the prevailing party shall be

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 29
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

allo wed attorney fees determined by the court, to be taxed and
collected as costs.
G. Fees collected pursuant to the provisions of this section
shall be remitted to the State Treasurer to be credited to the
General Revenue Fund in the State Treasury except as provided by
subsection H of this section.
H. Fees allocated to the Department by this section shall be
deposited in the Department of Public Safety Restricted Revolving
Fund In addition to the annual renewal fee established in subsection
C of this section, a wrecker or towing operator shall be subject to
an additional annual fee of One Hundred Twenty-five Dollars
($125.00) per truck in such operator’s fleet. All such fees shall
be deposited in the Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services Revolving
Fund established pursuant to Section 1 of this act.
SECTION 9. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 953.1, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 953.1. A. The rates established by the Corporation
Commission Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services Board established
pursuant to Section 6 of this act shall determine the nonconsensual
tow maximum fees and charges for wrecker or towing services
performed in this state, including incorporated and unincorporated
areas, by a wrecker or towing service licensed by the Department of
Public Safety Labor when that service appears on the rotation log of
the Department of Public Safety or on the rotation log of any
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 30
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

muni cipality, county or other political subdivision of this state,
and the services performed are at the request or at the direction of
any officer of the Department of Public Safety or of a municipality,
county, or political subdivision. No wrecker or towing service in
the performance of transporting or storing vehicles or other
property towed as a result of a nonconsensual tow shall charge any
fee which exceeds the maximum rates established by the Commission
Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services Board. Such rates shall be in
addition to any other rates, fees or charges authorized, allowed or
required by law and costs to collect such fees. Any wrecker or
towing service is authorized to collect from the owner, lienholder,
agent or insurer accepting liability for paying the claim for a
vehicle or purchasing the vehicle as a total loss vehicle from the
registered owner of any towed or stored vehicle, the fee required by
Section 904 of this title including environmental remediation fees
and services.
B. When wrecker or towing services are performed as provided in
subsection A of this section:
1. Each performance of a wrecker or towing service shall be
recorded by the operator on a bill or invoice as prescribed by rules
of the Department and by order of the Commission of Labor;
2. Nothing herein shall limit the right of an operator who has
provided or caused to be provided wrecker or towing services to

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 31
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

requ ire prepayment, in part or in full, or guarantee of payment of
any charges incurred for providing such services;
3. This section shall not be construed to require an operator
to charge a fee for the performance of any wrecker or towing
services; and
4. The operator is authorized to collect all lawful fees from
the owner, lienholder or agent or insurer accepting liability for
paying the claim for a vehicle or purchasing the vehicle as a total
loss vehicle from the registered owner of the towed vehicle for the
performance of any and all such services and costs to collect such
fees. An operator shall release the vehicle from storage upon
authorization from the owner, agent or lienholder of the vehicle or,
in the case of a total loss, the insurer accepting liability for
paying the claim for the vehicle or purchasing the vehicle where the
vehicle is to be moved to an insurance pool yard for sale.
C. The rates in subsections D through G of this section shall
be applicable until superseded by rates established by the
Commission.
D. Distance rates.
1. Rates in this subsection shall apply to the distance the
towed vehicle is transported and shall include services of the
operator of the wrecker vehicle. Hourly rates, as provided in
subsection E of this section, may be applied in lieu of distance
rates. Hourly rates may be applied from the time the wrecker
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 32
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

vehi cle is assigned to the service call until the time it is
released from service either upon return to the premises of the
wrecker or towing service or upon being assigned to perform another
wrecker or towing service, whichever occurs first. When the hourly
rate is applied in lieu of distance towing rates, the operator may
not apply the two-hour minimum prescribed in subsection E of this
section nor may hookup or mileage charges, as prescribed in this
section, be applied.
Such distance rates shall be computed via the shortest highway
mileage as determined from the latest official Oklahoma Department
of Transportation state highway map, except as follows:
a. for distances or portions of distances not
specifically provided for in the governing highway
map, the actual mileage via the shortest practical
route will apply,
b. in computing distances, fractions of a mile will be
retained until the final and full mileage is
determined, at which time any remaining fraction shall
be increased to the next whole mile,
c. when, due to circumstances beyond the control of the
wrecker or towing service, roadway conditions make it
impractical to travel via the shortest route, distance
rates shall be computed based on the shortest
practical route over which the wrecker vehicle and the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 33
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

vehicle it is towing can be moved, which route shall
be noted on the bill or invoice, or
d. when the wrecker or towing service is performed upon
any turnpike or toll road, the turnpike or toll road
mileage shall be used to determine the distance rates
charged and the turnpike or toll road fees may be
added to the bill or invoice.
2. Maximum distance rates shall be as follows:
Weight of Towed Vehicle Distance Rate
(In pounds, including Towed Per
equipment and lading) Mile
Single vehicle: 8,000 or less 25 miles or less $3.00
Single vehicle: 8,000 or less Over 25 miles $2.50
Single vehicle: 8,001 to 12,000 25 miles or less $3.40
Single vehicle: 8,001 to 12,000 Over 25 miles $3.00
Single vehicle: 12,001 to 40,000 Any $5.75
Single vehicle: 40,000 or over Any $6.75
Combination of vehicles Any $6.75
E. Hourly Rates.
1. Rates in this subsection shall apply for the use of a
wrecker vehicle and shall include services of the operator of such
wrecker, except as provided in paragraph 4 of this subsection.
Rates shall apply for all wrecker or towing services performed that
are not otherwise provided for in this section, including, but not
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 34
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

limi ted to, waiting and standby time, but shall not include the
first fifteen (15) minutes of service following the hookup of a
vehicle when a hookup fee is assessed, as provided in subsection F
of this section.
Hourly rates shall apply from the time the vehicle or labor is
assigned to the service call until the time it is released from
service either upon return to the premises of the wrecker or towing
service or upon being assigned to perform another wrecker or towing
service, whichever occurs first. Whenever a wrecker vehicle is used
to tow a vehicle subject to distance rates, as provided in
subsection D of this section, hourly rates shall apply only for the
time such wrecker is used in the performance of services other than
transportation, except when such hourly rates are used in lieu of
such distance rates.
As used in this subsection, rates stated per hour apply for
whole hours and, for fractions of an hour, rates stated per fifteen
(15) minutes apply for each fifteen (15) minutes or fraction thereof
over seven and one-half (7 1/2) minutes. However, if the service
subject to an hourly rate is performed in less than two (2) hours,
the charge applicable for two (2) hours may be assessed, except as
provided for in subsection D of this section.
2. Maximum hourly rates for wrecker or towing services
performed for passenger vehicles, when rates for such services are
not otherwise provided for by law, shall be as follows:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 35
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Weig ht of Towed Passenger Vehicle Rate Per Rate Per
(In pounds) Hour 15 Minutes
Single vehicle: 8,000 or less $60.00 $15.00
Single vehicle: 8,001 to 24,000 $80.00 $20.00
Single vehicle: 24,001 to 44,000 $120.00 $30.00
Single vehicle: 44,001 or over $180.00 $45.00
Combination of vehicles $180.00 $45.00
3. Maximum hourly rates for all other wrecker or towing
services, when rates for such other services are not otherwise
provided for by law, shall be determined based upon the gross
vehicle weight rating of each wrecker vehicle used as follows:
GVWR of Wrecker Vehicle Rate Per Rate Per
(In pounds) Hour 15 Minutes
8,000 or less $60.00 $15.00
8,001 to 24,000 $80.00 $20.00
24,001 to 44,000 $120.00 $30.00
44,001 or over $180.00 $45.00
Combination wrecker vehicle
with GVWR of 24,000 or over $180.00 $45.00
4. a. Maximum hourly rates for extra labor shall be Thirty
Dollars ($30.00) per person per hour.
b. Maximum hourly rates for skilled or specialized labor
and/or equipment shall be the actual customary and
ordinary rates charged for such labor and/or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 36
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

equipment. When skilled or specialized labor or
equipment is required, the wrecker operator’s cost for
such skilled or specialized labor or equipment plus a
twenty-five percent (25%) gross profit markup to cover
overhead costs for such labor will be added to the
invoice or freight bill to be collected in addition to
all other applicable charges.
F. Hookup Rates.
1. Rates in this subsection shall apply to the hookup of a
vehicle to a wrecker vehicle when such hookup is performed in
connection with a wrecker or towing service described in this
section. Such hookup rate shall include the first fifteen (15)
minutes of such service, for which there shall be no additional fee
charged, but shall not include the use of a dolly or rollback
equipment or a combination wrecker vehicle to accomplish such
hookup, for which an additional fee may be charged as provided in
subsection G of this section. Hookup shall include, but not be
limited to, the attachment of a vehicle to or the loading of a
vehicle onto a wrecker vehicle.
2. Maximum hookup rates shall be as follows:
Weight of Vehicle Being Hooked Up
(In pounds, including equipment Rate
and lading)
Single vehicle: 8,000 or less $65.00
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 37
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Sing le vehicle: 8,001 to 12,000 $75.00
Single vehicle: 12,001 to 24,000 $85.00
Single vehicle: 24,001 or over $95.00
Combination of vehicles $95.00
G. Additional Service Rates.
1. Rates in this subsection shall apply to the performance of
the following services:
a. the disconnection and reconnection of a towed
vehicle’s drive line when necessary to prevent
mechanical damage to such vehicle,
b. the removal and replacement of a towed vehicle’s axle
when necessary to prevent mechanical damage to such
vehicle, or
c. the use of a dolly or rollback equipment when
essential to prevent mechanical damage to a towed
vehicle or when neither end of such vehicle is capable
of being towed safely while in contact with the
roadway.
2. Maximum additional service rates shall be as follows:
Weight of Towed Service Performed
Vehicle (In pounds, Disconnect Reconnect Use of Dolly
including equipment Drive Line; Drive Line; or Rollback
and lading) Remove Axle Replace Axle Equipment
Rate Per Service Performed
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 38
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

8,00 0 or less $10.00 $15.00 $25.00
8,001 to 12,000 $15.00 $20.00 $30.00
Rate Per 15 Minutes of Service Performed
12,001 or over $20.00 $20.00 Not applicable
H. An operator shall be required to provide reasonable
documentation to the Department of Labor to substantiate all lawful
fees charged the owner, lienholder, agent or insurer paying the
claim for the towed vehicle. Fees for which the operator is being
reimbursed or having paid to a third party, shall include copies of
the invoice or other appropriate documents to substantiate such
payment to said third party.
I. D. Wrecker fees, including maximum distance, hourly, and
hookup rates shall be adjusted weekly by adding a fuel surcharge as
provided in this section. The fuel surcharge shall be based on the
Department of Energy “weekly retail on-highway diesel prices” for
the “Midwest region” using Two Dollars ($2.00) per gallon as the
base price with no fees added. The wrecker fees shall be adjusted
to allow a one-percent increase in fees for every ten-cent increase
in fuel cost starting at Two Dollars and ten cents ($2.10) per
gallon.
J. E. When skilled or specialized labor or equipment is
required, the cost incurred by the wrecker operator for such skilled
or specialized labor or equipment plus an additional twenty-five
percent (25%) gross profit markup or gross profit margin shall be
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 39
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

allo wed to cover overhead costs for such labor and will be added to
the invoice or freight bill to be collected in addition to all other
applicable charges. This applies to labor and equipment not
regulated by the Commission Oklahoma Wrecker Services Division
established pursuant to Section 2 of this act.
K. F. Wrecker operators shall be allowed to obtain ownership
and insurer information, including accident reports and other public
records, from the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or other
states’ motor vehicle agencies or from law enforcement agencies for
the purpose of determining ownership and responsibility for wrecker
fees. In the event a state of origin is not known, the Department
of Public Safety and the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma
shall assist in providing such information. The wrecker operator is
authorized to collect lawful fees for such costs and services from
the owner, or lienholder that seeks possession of a vehicle under a
security interest, agent, or insurer accepting liability for paying
the claim for a vehicle or purchasing the vehicle as a total loss
vehicle from the owner of any towed or stored vehicle.
SECTION 10. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 953.2, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 316, O.S.L. 2023 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 953.2), is amended to read as follows:
Section 953.2. A. The rates established by order of the
Corporation Commission the Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services
Board established pursuant to Section 6 of this act, through the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 40
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

auth ority of the Department of Labor, shall determine the maximum
fees and charges for the storage and after-hours release of
nonconsensual towed vehicles, including incorporated and
unincorporated areas, by a wrecker or towing service licensed by the
Department of Public Safety and repair facilities as defined in
Section 953 of Title 15 of the Oklahoma Statutes. No wrecker or
towing service or repair facilities shall charge any fee for
nonconsensual towed vehicles and storage which exceeds the maximum
rates established by the Commission Board. Such rates shall be in
addition to any other rates, fees or charges authorized, allowed or
required by law, including environmental remediation fees and
services.
B. 1. Storage or after-hours release of a towed vehicle, or
both, provided by a wrecker or towing service or by a repair
facility shall be recorded by the operator on a bill or invoice as
prescribed by rules of the Department.
2. Nothing herein shall limit the right of an operator or
repair facility who has provided or caused to be provided storage or
after-hours release of a towed vehicle, or both, to require
prepayment, in part or in full, or guarantee of payment of any
charges incurred for providing such services.
3. This section shall not be construed to require an operator
or repair facility to charge a fee for the storage or after-hours
release, or both, of any towed vehicle.
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 41
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

4. The operator or repair facility is authorized to collect all
lawful fees in acceptable forms of payment such as through check,
credit card, automated clearing house transfer, or debit card from
the owner, lienholder or agent of the towed vehicle or insurer
accepting liability for paying the claim for a vehicle or purchasing
the vehicle as a total loss vehicle from the registered owner for
the performance of any and all such services. An operator or repair
facility shall make the towed vehicle available for inspection by
the owner, lien holder, agent of the towed vehicle, or insurer
accepting liability for paying the claim for a vehicle and shall
release the vehicle from storage upon authorization from the owner,
agent or lienholder of the vehicle or in the case of a total loss,
the insurer accepting liability for paying the claim for the vehicle
or purchasing the vehicle where the vehicle is to be moved to an
insurance pool yard for sale.
C. The rates in subsections D through F of this section shall
be applicable until superseded by rates established by the
Commission.
D. Outdoor Storage Rates.
1. Rates in this subsection shall apply to the outdoor storage
of a towed vehicle. Rates may be applied from the time the towed
vehicle is brought onto the outdoor storage facility premises.
Rates shall apply to each calendar day of outdoor storage; provided,
the maximum twenty-four-hour fee, as provided for in this section,
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 42
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

may be charged for any towed vehicle which is stored for a portion
of a twenty-four-hour period.
2. Maximum outdoor storage rates shall be as follows:
Rate per Each
24-hour Period or
Type of Towed Vehicle Portion Thereof
Single vehicle: motorcycle, automobile,
or light truck up to 20 feet in length $15.00
Single vehicle or combination of vehicles
over 20 feet in length but less than 30
feet in length $20.00
Single vehicle or combination of vehicles
over 30 feet in length and up to 8 feet
in width $25.00
Single vehicle or combination of vehicles
over 30 feet in length and over 8 feet
in width $35.00
E. Indoor Storage Rates.
1. Rates in this subsection shall apply to the indoor storage
of a towed vehicle. Rates may be applied from the time the towed
vehicle is brought into the indoor storage facility premises. Rates
shall apply to each calendar day of indoor storage; provided, the
maximum twenty-four-hour fee, as provided for in this section, may

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 43
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

be c harged for any towed vehicle which is stored for a portion of a
twenty-four-hour period.
2. Maximum indoor storage rates shall be as follows:
Rate per Each
24-hour Period or
Type of Towed Vehicle Portion Thereof
Single vehicle: motorcycle, automobile,
or light truck up to 20 feet in length $25.00
Single vehicle or combination of vehicles
over 20 feet in length but less than 30
feet in length $30.00
Single vehicle or combination of vehicles
over 30 feet in length and up to 8 feet
in width $35.00
Single vehicle or combination of vehicles
over 30 feet in length and over 8 feet
in width $45.00
3. For purposes of this subsection, “indoor storage” means the
vehicle is kept in an enclosed facility.
F. After-Hours Release Rate.
1. The rate in this subsection shall apply to the release of a
towed vehicle to the owner, lienholder, or agent when such release
occurs at a time other than normal business hours.
2. As used in this subsection section:
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 44
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a. “after-hours release rate” shall mean
1. “After-hours release rate” means the rate charged for the
release of a towed vehicle between the hours of midnight and 8:00
a.m., or between the hours of 4:00 p.m. and midnight Monday through
Friday, or any time on Saturday, Sunday or a national holiday,; and
b. “national holiday” shall mean New Year’s Day, Martin
Luther King Day, George Washington’s Birthday, on the
third Monday in February, Memorial Day, Independence
Day, Labor Day, Veterans Day, Thanksgiving Day and
Christmas Day,
2. “National holiday” means any holiday observed on which
federal or state offices are closed and shall further include the
Friday before such national holiday which falls on a Saturday and
the Monday following such national holiday which falls on a Sunday.
3. The maximum after-hours release rate shall be Fifteen
Dollars ($15.00) per quarter hour for the release of any single
vehicle or combination of vehicles.
G. D. An operator or repair facility shall be required to
provide reasonable documentation to substantiate all lawful fees
charged the owner, lienholder, agent or insurer accepting liability
for paying the claim for the towed vehicle or purchasing the towed
vehicle. Fees for which the operator or repair facility is being
reimbursed, or having paid to a third party, shall include copies of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 45
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the invoice or other appropriate documents to substantiate the
payment to the third party.
SECTION 11. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 954, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 954. A. The Department of Public Safety Labor shall be
charged with the duty of enforcing the provisions of Section 951 et
seq. of this title for licensed wreckers and towing services
operating in this state.
B. Duly appointed peace officers of the political subdivisions
of this state shall have authority to detain and arrest any person
operating a wrecker or tow truck or offering towing services to the
public for a charge without a valid license issued pursuant to the
provisions of Section 951 et seq. of this title. Such officers,
upon reasonable belief that any wrecker or tow truck is being
operated without proper authority or without a valid license issued
pursuant to Section 951 et seq. of this title, shall be authorized
to require the operator thereof to stop and exhibit such
documentation as may be required to establish his or her authority
to tow or transport another vehicle or to prove possession of a
valid wrecker or tow service license issued in this state. Any
person convicted of operating a wrecker or tow truck or offering
towing services to the public for a charge in this state without a
license shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and punished with a fine of

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 46
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00). Law enforcement shall impound the
tow truck being used in violation of this section.
SECTION 12. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 954A, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 954A. A. In addition to any procedure provided by
local ordinance, whenever the owner or legal possessor of real
property or an authorized agent has reasonable cause to believe that
a vehicle has been abandoned thereon, said vehicle having been on
said property for a minimum of forty-eight (48) hours, or whenever a
vehicle is left upon said real property without express or implied
permission, such vehicle may be removed as provided in this section.
B. 1. The owner, legal possessor or authorized agent may
request any licensed Class AA wrecker service within the county
wherein the real property is located to remove the abandoned vehicle
from the premises by signing a Tow Request and Authorization Form
prescribed by the Department of Public Safety Labor and furnished to
licensed Class AA wrecker service operators as hereinafter provided.
2. If the owner, legal possessor or authorized agent of the
property owner is unable to obtain the services of a licensed Class
AA wrecker service to remove the abandoned vehicle in a reasonable
amount of time, the owner, legal possessor or authorized agent may
contact and request that a licensed Class AA wrecker service from an
adjacent county perform the service. A notation shall be made on
the Tow Request and Authorization Form that a licensed Class AA
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 47
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

wrec ker service in the county in which the real property is located
was contacted but the licensed Class AA wrecker service was not able
to perform the removal in a reasonable amount of time.
C. A licensed Class AA wrecker service removing an abandoned
vehicle pursuant to this section shall be subject to the maximum
rates established by the Corporation Commission Oklahoma Wrecker and
Towing Services Board established pursuant to Section 6 of this act.
D. The Department Board shall design and promulgate a suitable
Tow Request and Authorization Form containing space for the
following information:
1. A description of the vehicle, including the type of vehicle,
year of manufacture, name of the manufacturer, vehicle color or
colors, identification number and license tag number;
2. The name, address and business telephone number of the
licensed Class AA wrecker service;
3. The name, address, telephone number and driver license
number or state-issued identification card number of the real
property owner, legal possessor or authorized agent;
4. Inventory of personal property within the vehicle to be
towed;
5. Time and date the form is completed; and
6. Signatures of the driver of the wrecker vehicle and of the
owner, legal possessor or authorized agent of the real property.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 48
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

The Department or the Commission Board may require additional
information on the Tow Request and Authorization Form. The driver
license number or state-issued identification card number of the
real property owner, legal possessor or authorized agent shall not
be disclosed by the Department or the Commission to any entity
inquiring about services performed without a court order or without
written consent from the property owner, legal possessor or
authorized agent.
E. The real property owner, legal possessor or authorized agent
and the wrecker vehicle driver shall jointly, and each in the
presence of the other, inventory personal property found within or
upon the vehicle and each shall accordingly sign a statement on the
form reflecting this requirement has been fulfilled. In the event
an inventory cannot be completed, the reasons therefor shall be
clearly stated on the form.
F. A copy of the completed Tow Request and Authorization Form
shall be retained by the signatories and the licensed Class AA
wrecker service shall maintain the wrecker vehicle driver’s copy for
not less than one (1) year, or longer if required by the Department
or the Commission. The licensed Class AA wrecker service shall
forthwith send the completed original Tow Request and Authorization
Form to the Department and the remaining copy of the completed form
to the local police department of the municipality in which the real
property is located, or the sheriff’s office of the county from
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 49
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

whic h the vehicle was towed, if the real property is located outside
of an incorporated municipality. A facsimile copy of the Tow
Request and Authorization Form shall be considered the original form
if a printed or digital confirmation of the facsimile transmission
is available.
G. Within three (3) business days of the time indicated on the
form, the licensed Class AA wrecker service shall request the
Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or other an appropriate
motor license agent licensed operator to furnish the name and
address of the current owner of and any lienholder upon the vehicle.
The Tax Commission Service Oklahoma or an appropriate motor license
agent licensed operator shall respond in person or by certified mail
to the licensed Class AA wrecker service within five (5) business
days from the receipt of the request for information. The
Department and the Oklahoma Tax Commission Service Oklahoma shall
render assistance to ascertain ownership, if needed. The licensed
Class AA wrecker service shall, within seven (7) days from receipt
of the requested information from the Oklahoma Tax Commission
Service Oklahoma or other motor license agent a licensed operator,
send a notice of the location of the vehicle by certified mail, or
if by Department notification, the Department may notify by first-
class mail, postage prepaid, at the addresses furnished, to the
owner and any lienholder of the vehicle. The owner or lienholder
may regain possession of the vehicle in accordance with rules of the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 50
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Depa rtment upon payment of the licensed Class AA wrecker services,
costs of certified mailing and the reasonable cost of towing and
storage of the vehicle. If the licensed Class AA wrecker service
has not complied with the notification procedures required by this
subsection, the owner or lienholder shall not be required to pay for
storage of the vehicle.
H. No licensed Class AA wrecker service or operator of a
licensed Class AA wrecker service shall tow or cause to be towed a
vehicle pursuant to this section until the form furnished by the
Department has been appropriately completed by the parties as
required by rules of the Department.
SECTION 13. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 955, as
amended by Section 12, Chapter 228, O.S.L. 2022 (47 O.S. Supp. 2025,
Section 955), is amended to read as follows:
Section 955. A. Any officer of the Department of Public Safety
Labor or any other political subdivision of this state is hereby
authorized to cause to be towed any vehicle found upon public roads,
highways, streets, turnpikes, private parking lots accessible to the
public, other public places or upon any private road, street, alley
or lane which provides access to one or more single-family or
multifamily dwellings when:
1. A report has been made that the vehicle has been stolen or
taken without the consent of its owner;

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 51
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

2. The officer has reason to believe the vehicle has been
abandoned as defined in Sections 901 and 902 of this title;
3. The person driving or in control of the vehicle is arrested
for an alleged offense for which the officer is required by law to
take the person arrested or summoned before a proper magistrate
without unnecessary delay;
4. At the scene of an accident, if the owner or driver is not
in a position to take charge of the vehicle and direct or request
its proper removal;
5. The officer has probable cause that the person operating the
vehicle has not been granted driving privileges or that the driving
privileges of the person are currently suspended, revoked, canceled,
denied, or disqualified;
6. The officer has probable cause that the vehicle has been
used in the commission of a felony offense and the officer has
obtained a search warrant authorizing the search and seizure of the
vehicle;
7. The officer has probable cause that the vehicle is not
insured as required by the Compulsory Insurance Law of this state;
or
8. The vehicle is involved in a fatal motor vehicle collision
and is needed for evidentiary purposes; or
9. A vehicle is left unattended upon any street, sidewalk,
alley or thoroughfare and constitutes a hazard or obstruction to the
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 52
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

norm al movement of public transit along a rail fixed guideway. An
unattended vehicle shall be deemed to constitute an obstruction if
any portion of the vehicle remains in that lane utilized for the
rail fixed guideway as designated by traffic lane markings or if any
portion of the vehicle is outside of the designated parking location
and protrudes into the lane of traffic utilized for the rail fixed
guideway. For purposes of this paragraph, the head of a political
subdivision’s transportation division may authorize employees to
cause to be towed any vehicle which constitutes a hazard or
obstruction to the normal movement of public transit along a rail
fixed guideway.
No vehicle shall be released after impoundment unless the owner
provides to the storing facility proof of valid insurance or an
affidavit of nonuse on the roadway, or in the event of a release
request from an insurer or the representative of the insurer who has
accepted liability for the vehicle, no such proof of insurance or
affidavit of nonuse on the roadway shall be required.
B. A licensed wrecker operator is not liable for damage to a
vehicle, vessel, or cargo that obstructs the normal movement of
traffic or creates a hazard to traffic and is removed in compliance
with the request of a law enforcement officer, unless there is
failure to exercise reasonable care in the performance of the act or
for conduct that is willful or malicious.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 53
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

C. Each officer of the Department shall use the services of the
licensed wrecker operator whose location is nearest to the vehicle
to be towed in all instances in subsection A of this section. The
requests for services may be alternated or rotated among all
licensed wrecker operators who are located within a reasonable
radius of each other. In like manner, the officer shall advise any
person requesting information as to the availability of a wrecker or
towing service, the name of the nearest licensed wrecker operator,
giving equal consideration to all licensed wrecker operators located
within a reasonable radius of each other. In cities with a
population of less than fifty thousand (50,000) population according
to the latest Federal Decennial Census, all licensed wrecker
operators located near or in the city limits of such cities shall be
considered as being equal distance and shall be called on an equal
basis as nearly as possible. In counties bordering other states, if
the officer deems safety and time considerations warrant, the
officer may call a wrecker or towing service that is not on the
rotation log.
D. Any officer of the Department who has been requested by a
person in need of wrecker or towing service to call a specific
wrecker or towing service for such person, and who calls a different
wrecker or towing service other than the one requested, without the
consent of the person, except where hazardous conditions exist,
shall be subject to progressive discipline issued by the Department
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 54
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

exce pt in instances where a vehicle is removed from the roadway
under the authority of paragraphs 3, 4 and 6 of subsection A of this
section.
E. Operators conducting a tow under this section shall release
all personal property within the vehicle to an insurer or
representative of the insurer who has accepted liability for the
vehicle, or to the registered owner or the owner’s personal
representative as designated by the registered owner on a form
approved by the Department of Labor. The registered owner or
representative of the registered owner shall provide proof of
identity in accordance with the Department’s rules related to
establishing identity. Upon the release of personal property to an
insurer or representative of the insurer, wrecker operators shall be
exempt from all liability and shall be held harmless for any losses
or claims of loss. Personal property shall include everything in a
vehicle except the vehicle, the attached or installed equipment,
vehicle keys or devices to start and unlock the vehicle, and the
spare tire and tools to change the tire. Interlock devices may be
removed pursuant to Section 11-902a of this title. If release of
personal property occurs during normal business hours as prescribed
by the Corporation Commission Department, it shall be at no cost to
the registered owner or the owner prior to the repossession. After-
hour fees may be assessed as prescribed by this Chapter or by the

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 55
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

Corp oration Commission Department, when the release of property is
made after the prescribed normal business hours.
F. The operator of a wrecker or towing service may request a
person offering proof of ownership of personal property and any
interlock device to execute a form provided by the operator
exempting the operator from liability for such release.
SECTION 14. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 956, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 956. A. No operator, employee, or contractor of a
wrecker or towing service or of a person or business that derives
any business or income from a wrecker or towing service shall offer,
and no officer or employee of the Corporation Commission Department
of Labor, Department of Public Safety, or any political subdivision
of the state shall accept, directly or indirectly, any compensation,
gift, loan, favor or service given for the purpose of influencing
the officer or employee in the discharge of official duties of the
person.
B. Except as provided in subsection C of this section, no
employee of the Department of Labor, officer of the Commission,
Department of Public Safety, or any law enforcement officer of any
political subdivision of the state shall have any interest,
financial or otherwise, in a wrecker or towing service, or with a
person or in a business that derives business or income from a
wrecker or towing service, nor shall a wrecker or towing service or
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 56
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

a pe rson or business that derives any business or income from a
wrecker or towing service employ such officer or employee.
C. An employee of the Department of Labor, officer of the
Commission, Department of Public Safety, or a law enforcement
officer of any political subdivision may have an interest, financial
or otherwise, in or may be employed by a wrecker or towing service
when the sole purpose and only business of the wrecker or towing
service is to perform repossessions of vehicles which that are
subject to lien and are being repossessed by the lien holder of
record.
SECTION 15. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 966, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 966. A. This act shall be known and may be cited as
the “Nonconsensual Towing Act of 2011”.
B. The provisions of this act shall apply to every wrecker
operating within the State of Oklahoma this state removing and
storing vehicles from Oklahoma roads and highways or private
property as a result of a nonconsensual tow.
C. The Corporation Commission, by Commission order Department
of Labor, through the Oklahoma Wrecker and Towing Services Board
established pursuant to Section 6 of this act, shall have the power
and authority necessary:


SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 57
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

1. To establish wrecker rates for the transportation and
storage of motor vehicles removed due to a nonconsensual tow from
Oklahoma roads and highways or private property;
2. To supervise and enforce such rates; and
3. To mediate and adjudicate complaints that may arise from
charges assessed as a result of such vehicle removal.
D. Rates as specified in Sections 953.1 and 953.2 of Title 47
of the Oklahoma Statutes by the Corporation Commission shall remain
in effect for twelve (12) months following the effective date of
this act and until rates are established by order of the Commission
the Board.
E. Rates established by the Commission Board shall be fair and
reasonable.
F. The Commission Board may assess fines or other penalties to
any wrecker or towing service for failure to comply with prescribed
rates as established by the Commission Board, failure to pay a
levied assessment, or failure to comply with any applicable order of
the Commission rule of the Board. Repeat violations by a wrecker or
towing service are cause for revocation of its license issued by the
Department of Public Safety Labor.
G. The Department of Public Safety shall cooperate with the
Commission Department of Labor to implement this act and may enter
into agreements to facilitate this act.

SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 58
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

SECTION 16. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 967, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 967. A. The Corporation Commission Department of Labor
is hereby authorized to assess a fee upon each wrecker or towing
service licensed by the Department of Public Safety and placed upon
an official rotation log, as specified in Section 952 of Title 47 of
the Oklahoma Statutes this title, to perform nonconsensual tows.
B. Each wrecker or towing service shall pay the assessment,
levied pursuant to this section, on an annual basis.
C. The assessment shall be predicated upon the number of
wrecker or towing vehicles utilized by the wrecker or towing service
to conduct its Department-licensed operations.
D. Commencing with assessments made after June 30, 2017,
failing to pay the wrecker or towing services assessment by the due
date established by the Corporation Commission Department shall
result in an additional penalty of twenty-five percent (25%) per
vehicle. The Transportation Division Director, or designee,
Department may waive the penalty for good cause shown. Failure to
pay the assessment and penalty within thirty (30) days of the notice
of penalty issued by the Corporation Commission Department shall
result in revocation of the wrecker or towing license issued by the
Department.
E. Beginning fiscal year 2013, the The Legislature shall
establish budgetary limits for the Commission Department to fulfill
SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 59
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)

the duties of the Nonconsensual Towing Act of 2011. The total
assessments levied pursuant to this section shall not exceed the
amount of the budgetary limits and indirect costs for related
support functions established by the Legislature for any fiscal
year. Annual budgetary limits shall stay in effect unless
superseded by action of the Legislature.
SECTION 17. AMENDATORY 47 O.S. 2021, Section 968, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 968. The Corporation Commission is Department of Labor
shall be authorized to appoint unclassified employees to perform the
duties and responsibilities associated with the Nonconsensual Towing
Act of 2011.
SECTION 18. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
COMMITTEE REPORT BY: COMMITTEE ON BUSINESS AND INSURANCE
April 16, 2026 - DO PASS AS AMENDED BY CS










SENATE FLOOR VERSION - HB3297 SFLR Page 60
(Bold face denotes Committee Amendments)